Wyoming, session 2025, SF0085.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 9-14-601 is created to read:

ARTICLE 6
PROTECTION FROM STATE LAW VIOLATIONS
BY COUNTIES, CITIES AND TOWNS
SF0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0332

9-14-601. Violations of law by counties, cities and
towns; withholding of funds.

(a) Subject to subsection (c) of this section, at the
written request of one (1) or more members of the
legislature, the attorney general shall investigate any
ordinance, regulation, order or other official action
adopted or taken by the governing body of a county, city or
town that the member or members alleges violates state law
or the constitution of Wyoming.

(b) The attorney general shall make a written report
of findings and conclusions as a result of the
investigation not later than thirty (30) days after receipt
of a request under subsection (a) of this section and shall
provide a copy of the report to the governor, the president
of the senate, the speaker of the house of representatives,
the member or members of the legislature making the
original request and the secretary of state. If the
attorney general concludes that the ordinance, regulation,
order or other official action under investigation:

SF0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0332
(i) Violates any provision of state law or the
constitution of Wyoming, the attorney general shall provide
notice to the governing body of the county, city or town,
by certified mail, of the violation and shall indicate that
the county, city or town has thirty (30) days to resolve
the violation. If the attorney general determines that the
county, city or town has failed to resolve the violation
not later than thirty (30) days after receiving notice, the
attorney general shall:

(A) Notify the state treasurer, who shall
withhold any undistributed state revenues from the county,
city or town as provided by W.S. 39-15-111(r) and
39-16-111(p);

(B) Continue to monitor the response of the
governing body. When the offending ordinance, regulation,
order or action is repealed or the violation is otherwise
resolved, the attorney general shall notify:

(I) The governor, the president of the
senate, the speaker of the house of representatives and the
SF0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0332
member or members of the legislature making the original
request that the violation has been resolved;

(II) The state treasurer to resume the
distribution of state monies to the county, city or town.

(ii) Does not violate any provision of state law
or the constitution of Wyoming, the attorney general shall
take no further action pursuant to this section.

(c) Before a member of the legislature may request an
investigation by the attorney general pursuant to
subsection (a) of this section of any ordinance,
regulation, order or other official action adopted by any
county, city or town, the member of the legislature shall
first provide a written notification of the alleged
violation of state law or the constitution of Wyoming to
the chief executive officer or governing body of the
county, city or town. If the county, city or town does not
repeal or otherwise resolve the violation within sixty (60)
days after receiving the notification, the member of the
legislature may request an investigation by the attorney
general pursuant to this section.
SF0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0332

(d) This article shall not prohibit actions under
other statutory or common-law provisions against an
ordinance, regulation, order or other official action
adopted or taken by the governing body of a county, city or
town that violates state law or the constitution of
Wyoming. However, the remedies provided in this article are
the exclusive remedies for actions brought pursuant to this
article.

Section 2. W.S. 39-15-111(b)(iii)(intro) and by
creating a new subsection (r) and 39-16-111(b)(iii)(intro)
and by creating a new subsection (p) are amended to read:

39-15-111. Distribution.

(b) Revenues earned under W.S. 39-15-104 during each
fiscal year shall be recognized as revenue during that
fiscal year for accounting purposes. Except as otherwise
provided in subsection (p) of this section, for all revenue
collected by the department under W.S. 39-15-104 the
department shall:

SF0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0332
(iii) From the remaining share, until June 30,
2004, deduct an amount equivalent to one-half percent
(0.5%) and thereafter deduct an amount equivalent to one
percent (1%) of the tax collected under W.S. 39-15-104.
From this amount, the department shall distribute until
June 30, 2004, twenty thousand dollars ($20,000.00) and
thereafter, except as otherwise provided by subsection (r)
of this section, forty thousand dollars ($40,000.00)
annually to each county in equal monthly installments and
then distribute the remainder to each county in the
proportion that the total population of the county bears to
the total population of the state. The balance shall then
be paid monthly to the treasurers of the counties, cities
and towns for payment into their respective general funds.
The percentage of the balance that will be distributed to
each county and its cities and towns will be determined by
computing the percentage that net sales taxes collected
attributable to vendors in each county including its cities
and towns bear to total net sales taxes collected of
vendors in all counties including their cities and towns.
Subject to subsection (h) of this section, this percentage
of the balance shall be distributed within each county as
follows:
SF0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0332

(r) Upon notice from the attorney general pursuant to
W.S. 9-14-601(b) that an ordinance, regulation, order or
other official action adopted or taken by a governing body
of a county, city or town violates state law or the
constitution of Wyoming, the state treasurer shall withhold
the distribution of monies due under paragraph (b)(iii) of
this section to the identified county, city or town and
shall continue to withhold monies pursuant to this
subsection until the attorney general certifies to the
state treasurer that the violation has been resolved. Any
funds withheld under this subsection shall be held in the
general fund and shall revert to the general fund at the
end of the fiscal biennium in which the funds were
withheld. The state treasurer shall not withhold any amount
that the county, city or town certifies to the attorney
general and the state treasurer as being necessary to make
any required deposits or payments for debt service on bonds
or other long-term obligations of the county, city or town
that were issued or incurred before committing the
violation.

39-16-111. Distribution.
SF0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0332

(b) Revenues earned under this article during each
fiscal year shall be recognized as revenue during that
fiscal year for accounting purposes. Revenue collected by
the department from the taxes imposed by this article shall
be transferred to the state treasurer who shall, as
specified by the department:

(iii) From the remaining share, until June 30,
2004, deduct an amount equivalent to one-half percent
(0.5%) and thereafter deduct an amount equivalent to one
percent (1%) of the tax collected under W.S. 39-16-104.
From this amount, the department shall distribute until
June 30, 2004, five thousand dollars ($5,000.00) and
thereafter ten thousand dollars ($10,000.00) annually to
each county in equal monthly installments and then
distribute the remainder to each county in the proportion
that the total population of the county bears to the total
population of the state. Except as provided in subsection
(p) of this section, the remainder shall then be paid
monthly to the treasurers of the counties, cities and towns
for payment into their respective general funds. The
percentage of the remainder that will be distributed to
SF0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0332
each county and its cities and towns will be determined by
computing the percentage that net use taxes collected
attributable to vendors in each county including its cities
and towns bear to total net use taxes collected of vendors
in all counties including their cities and towns. The
distribution shall be as follows:

(p) Upon notice from the attorney general pursuant to
W.S. 9-14-601(b) that an ordinance, regulation, order or
other official action adopted or taken by a governing body
of a county, city or town violates state law or the
constitution of Wyoming, the state treasurer shall withhold
the distribution of monies due under paragraph (b)(iii) of
this section to the identified county, city or town and
shall continue to withhold monies pursuant to this
subsection until the attorney general certifies to the
state treasurer that the violation has been resolved. Any
funds withheld under this subsection shall be held in the
general fund and shall revert to the general fund at the
end of the fiscal biennium in which the funds were
withheld. The state treasurer shall not withhold any amount
that the county, city or town certifies to the attorney
general and the state treasurer as being necessary to make
SF0085

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0332
any required deposits or payments for debt service on bonds
or other long-term obligations of the county, city or town
that were issued or incurred before committing the
violation.

Section 3. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
SF0085